Washington statutes.
RCW 18.420.080

Renewal of certificate.

The secretary shall establish, by rule, the requirements and fees for renewal of a certificate issued pursuant to this chapter. Fees must be established in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 43.70.250. Failure to renew the certificate invalidates the certificate and all privileges granted by the certificate. If a certificate has lapsed for a period longer than three years, the person shall demonstrate competence to the satisfaction of the secretary by completing continuing competency requirements or meeting other standards determined by the secretary.

[ 2023 c 469 s 10.]